Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-2507
Electrotherapeutic agent modalities, defined.

Electrotherapeutic agent modalities means the use of electrotherapeutic currents and waveforms to (1) facilitate physiologic changes in tissues to increase circulation, facilitate tissue healing, and modulate pain, including, but not limited to, high-voltage galvanic stimulation for tissue and wound repair and high-voltage pulsed current, and (2) facilitate neuromuscular or sensory activity to improve muscle strength, reeducate muscle function, or modulate pain response, including, but not limited to, neuromuscular electrical stimulation, functional electrical stimulation, transcutaneous electrical nerve stimulation, and interferential current.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 847;

Laws 2025, LB257, § 6.